Utah statutes.
17-25-4.   Constables' fees in criminal cases -- Procedure.
Accounts against the county filed by constables for services in criminal cases
shall be certified as correct by the county attorney or district attorney and
shall be presented to the auditor.  The county legislative body may reject
such bills in all causes or proceedings in which the county attorney or
district attorney has not in writing authorized the issuance of the warrant of
arrest.
